District of Columbia statutes.
2-381.32

Applicability.

This subchapter shall apply to claims arising between April 20, 1999 and December 31, 2005, and to contracts executed and in effect between April 20, 1999 and December 31, 2005.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-244, § 3, 46 DCR 1080

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 2-323.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-1188.52.